Missouri, session 2026, SB1741.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 441.920, RSMo, is repealed and three
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
441.920, 441.921, and 441.922, to read as follows:
441.920. 1. For purposes of [this section] sections
441.920 to 441.922, the following terms mean:
(1) "Domestic violence", as such term is defined in
section 455.010;
(2) "Household member", a minor or adult, other than a
perpetrator of an act of domestic violence, who resides with
a tenant or lessee;
(3) "Sexual assault", as such term is defined in
section 455.010;
[(3)] (4) "Stalking", as such term is defined in
section 455.010.
2. No applicant, tenant, or lessee shall be denied
tenancy, be evicted from the premises, or found to be in
violation of a lease agreement on the basis of or as a
direct result of the fact that the applicant, tenant, or
lessee is, has been, or is in imminent danger of becoming a
victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking if
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1741 2
the applicant, tenant, or lessee otherwise qualifies for
tenancy or occupancy in the premises. The provisions of
this subsection shall not apply if:
(1) The applicant, tenant, or lessee allowed the
person named in any documentation listed in subsection 4 of
this section into the premises; or
(2) The landlord or property owner reasonably believes
that a person named in any documentation listed in
subsection 4 of this section poses a threat to the safety of
the other occupants or the property.
3. In any action brought by a landlord against a
tenant under this chapter, chapter 534, or chapter 535, a
tenant shall have an affirmative defense and not be liable
for rent for the period after which the tenant vacates the
premises owned by the landlord if, by a preponderance of the
evidence, the court finds that the tenant was a victim or
was in imminent danger of becoming a victim of domestic
violence, sexual assault, or stalking and the tenant
notified the landlord and has provided any requested
documentation under subsection 4 of this section.
4. An applicant, tenant, or lessee shall qualify for
the protections under this section if he or she provides a
statement of such domestic violence, sexual assault, or
stalking to his or her landlord or the property owner. If
the landlord or property owner requests, the applicant,
tenant, or lessee shall provide documentation of the
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, which may be
in any of the following forms:
(1) A document signed by an employee of a victim
service provider, or a health care professional or mental
health professional from whom the victim has sought
assistance relating to domestic violence, sexual assault,

SB 1741 3
stalking, or the effects of abuse stating that, under
penalty of perjury, the individual believes in the
occurrence of the incident of domestic violence, sexual
assault, or stalking that is the ground for protection, and
that the incident meets the applicable definition of
domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking. Such
document shall be signed by the victim; or
(2) A record of a federal, state, or local law
enforcement agency, including a police report, a court, or
an administrative agency pertaining to the alleged incident
of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking.
5. The submission of false information by an
applicant, tenant, or lessee under this section may be a
basis for a denial of tenancy, eviction, or a violation of a
lease agreement.
6. Any landlord or property owner may impose a
reasonable termination fee on a tenant or lessee who desires
to terminate a lease before the expiration date of such
lease under the provisions of this section.
7. The provisions of this section shall only apply to
residential properties.
441.921. 1. Where an act of domestic violence is
perpetrated against a tenant or lessee, or a household
member of a tenant or lessee, by another tenant, lessee, or
occupant of the same dwelling unit, the tenant or lessee may
have the perpetrator removed from the rental agreement and
excluded from the premises if the tenant, lessee, or
household member has:
(1) Obtained a protective order, restraining order, or
other similar relief which applies to the perpetrator of the
act of domestic violence; or

SB 1741 4
(2) Obtained a record from a federal, state, or local
law enforcement agency, including a police report, a court,
or an administrative agency pertaining to the alleged
incident of domestic violence.
2. To have the perpetrator removed from a rental
agreement, the tenant or lessee shall provide the landlord:
(1) A copy of the documentation described in
subsection 1 of this section; and
(2) A written notice containing:
(a) The full legal name of the tenant, lessee, or
occupant who is the perpetrator of the act of domestic
violence;
(b) The date on which the tenant wishes the notice of
termination to be served upon the perpetrator. Such date
shall be at least five days but no more than thirty days
after the date the tenant or lessee provides the
documentation and written notice to the landlord; and
(c) The preferred method by which to receive future
communications from the landlord.
3. (1) When a tenant or lessee has complied with the
requirements of subsection 2 of this section, a landlord
may, after five days of notice of termination of the rental
agreement and without the right of the tenant or lessee to
cure the default, file suit and have judgment against only
the perpetrator for recovery of possession of the premises
in accordance with sections 441.710 to 441.880. The
landlord shall serve the notice of termination on the date
requested by the tenant or lessee in accordance with
paragraph (b) of subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this
section.
(2) If the perpetrator vacates the premises within
five days of the notice, the landlord shall:

SB 1741 5
(a) Install new locks to the dwelling unit in
accordance with section 441.922; and
(b) Timely notify the requesting tenant or lessee by
the method requested pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section that the new
locks have been installed and how the tenant or lessee can
obtain access to the dwelling unit.
(3) (a) If the perpetrator fails to vacate the
premises within five days of the notice, the landlord shall:
a. File suit for recovery of possession of the
premises against the perpetrator only; and
b. Timely notify the requesting tenant or lessee by
the method requested pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section of the
hearing date of the suit for recovery of possession and the
judgment of any such suit.
(b) If a judgment is entered in favor of the landlord
in a suit brought pursuant to this section in accordance
with sections 441.710 to 441.880, the landlord shall:
a. Be entitled to recover court costs and reasonable
attorney's fees from the perpetrator;
b. Install new locks to the dwelling unit in
accordance with section 441.922;
c. Timely notify the requesting tenant or lessee by
the method requested pursuant to paragraph (b) of
subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section that the new
locks have been installed and how the tenant or lessee can
obtain access to the dwelling unit; and
d. Refuse access to the dwelling unit by the
perpetrator for the purposes of reclaiming property, unless
a law enforcement officer escorts the perpetrator into and
out of the dwelling unit.

SB 1741 6
4. A landlord shall not be liable for any actions
taken in good faith pursuant to this section.
441.922. 1. When an act of domestic violence is
perpetrated against a tenant or lessee, or a household
member of a tenant or lessee, by someone who is not a
tenant, lessee, or occupant of the same dwelling unit, the
tenant or lessee may require the landlord to change the
locks to the dwelling unit if the tenant, lessee, or
household member has:
(1) Obtained a protective order, restraining order, or
other similar relief which applies to the perpetrator of the
act of domestic violence; or
(2) Obtained a record from a federal, state, or local
law enforcement agency, including a police report, a court,
or an administrative agency pertaining to the alleged
incident of domestic violence.
2. To have a lock changed under this section, the
tenant or lessee shall provide the landlord:
(1) A copy of the documentation described in
subsection 1 of this section; and
(2) A written request that the locks be changed
immediately.
3. The landlord shall change the locks to the dwelling
unit within twenty-four hours after the tenant or lessee
provides the landlord with the documentation and request
required under subsection 2 of this section:
(1) Replacing the entire locking mechanism with a
locking mechanism of equal or better quality than the lock
being replaced; or
(2) If the lock is in good working condition:
(a) Rekeying the lock; or

SB 1741 7
(b) In the case of a keyless electronic lock,
resetting the entry code.
4. If a landlord fails to change the locks as required
by subsection 3 of this section, the tenant or lessee:
(1) May change the locks in a workmanlike manner with
locks of similar or better quality than the original lock;
(2) Shall timely notify the landlord that the locks
have been changed; and
(3) Shall, by a reasonable method agreed upon by the
landlord and tenant or lessee, provide the landlord with a
new key or the entry code by which to access the dwelling
unit.
5. Subsection 4 of this section shall apply
notwithstanding any provision in the rental agreement to the
contrary.
6. A landlord who installs a new lock pursuant to this
section may retain a copy of the key or entry code that
opens the new lock.
7. A landlord who installs a new lock pursuant to this
section may require the tenant or lessee to pay for the
actual and reasonable cost incurred by the landlord in
changing the locks.
✓